Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 1. Medical Assistance for the Aged.

§ 43-13-1.
Citation of article.

This article shall be known as and may be cited as the “Medical Assistance for the Aged Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-01; Laws, 1964, ch. 446, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 43-13-3.
Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires a different meaning as used in this article:

“Medical assistance for the aged” means payment of part or all of the cost of the following care and services provided for persons sixty-five (65) years of age or older who are not recipients of old age assistance but whose income and resources are insufficient to meet all of such cost:

Inpatient hospital services;

Skilled nursing-home services;

Physicians’ services;

Outpatient hospital or clinic services;

Home health care services;

Private duty nursing service;

Physical therapy and related services;

Dental and optometric services;

Laboratory and X-ray services;

Prescribed drugs, eyeglasses, dentures, and prosthetic devices;

Diagnostic, screening, and preventive services; and

Any other medical care or remedial care recognized under state law.

The definitions of the care and services listed above shall be in keeping with Title I or Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act as amended, the rules and regulations promulgated by the secretary of health, education, and welfare, and the state licensing laws governing such care and services when licensing is required.

“Administering agency” means the state department of public welfare, the state board of public welfare of which shall have the duty of making and publishing rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the terms of this article, as may be necessary for its efficient administration.

“A vendor payment” is a payment made directly to a supplier or provider of medical and remedial care or service on behalf of an eligible recipient of medical assistance to the aged.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-02; Laws, 1964, ch. 446, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 43-13-5.
Medical assistance for the aged.

The State Department of Public Welfare, after having made a determination with respect to eligibility with due regard to the resources and income of the applicant, may make vendor payments on behalf of eligible individuals for such care as may be authorized within the limits of available funds, provided that such medical or remedial care is rendered by or under the supervision of a licensed practitioner, and provided further that no regulation shall be promulgated which limits or abridges the recipient’s free choice of the provider of medical and remedial care or service. Such recipients of medical assistance for the aged shall only be persons:

Who shall have attained the age of sixty-five (65) years;

Who are not receiving old age assistance;

Who have net income and resources not exceeding amounts as may be set forth from time to time by the administering agency of the state; and

Who have not made a voluntary assignment or transfer of property for the purpose of qualifying for such assistance at any time within two (2) years immediately prior to the filing of an application for medical assistance for the aged.

Medical assistance for the aged shall be payable under this article on behalf of any person who is a patient of an institution, public or private, where such payments are matchable under the provisions of the federal Social Security Act as amended and where such institution conforms to the requirements of the federal Social Security Act as amended and the applicable statutes of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-03; Laws, 1964, ch. 446, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 43-13-7.
Obligations upon the administering agency.

The administering agency, in providing medical assistance for the aged, shall:

Include some institutional and some noninstitutional medical care;

Provide an opportunity for hearing before an appeals and review body within the agency for any applicant whose application is denied upon request by such applicant, who has been denied the opportunity to apply for such assistance, whose application has not been acted upon with reasonable promptness, whose benefit hereunder has not been forthcoming with reasonable promptness after a determination of eligibility and approval of the application has been made, whose benefit authorization has been revoked, and/or whose benefit authorization is reduced;

Provide that, in the issuance of regulations, no enrollment fee, premium, or similar charge may be imposed as a condition of the individual’s eligibility for such assistance;

Provide for the furnishing of such assistance to residents of the state who are temporarily absent therefrom;

Publish and make available a description of services to be provided to help recipients attain self-care including utilization of other agencies providing similar or related services;

Provide safeguards which restrict the use or disclosure of information concerning applicants and recipients to purposes directly connected with the administration of the state program;

Establish reasonable standards for determining eligibility for and the extent of such assistance;

Provide that no lien will be imposed on the property of the recipient prior to his death and that there will be no recovery until after death from such a recipient and the surviving spouse, if any, for any medical assistance correctly paid on behalf of such recipient; and

Promulgate no citizenship requirement for eligibility which excludes a citizen of the United States.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-04; Laws, 1964, ch. 446, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 43-13-9.
Medical advisory committee.

The state board of public welfare shall appoint a medical advisory committee consisting of not less than nine (9) nor more than twenty (20) physicians from among nominees made by the Mississippi State Medical Association whose respective tenures of service shall be not less than two (2) nor more than four (4) years. Members of this committee shall serve without compensation, but expenses to defray actual expenses incurred in the performance of travel, lodging, and subsistence may be authorized, shall meet not less than twice annually, and shall be furnished written notice of meetings called at least ten (10) days prior to the date of the meeting. The state board of public welfare may also appoint one (1) person from each of the other medical or remedial care professions to serve as members of the medical advisory committee if, in the opinion of the board, their service on said committee would be helpful to the state department of public welfare in administering the provisions of this article. The committee, among its duties and responsibilities prescribed and agreed to, shall:

Advise the administering agency and personnel thereof with respect to determining the quantity and extent of medical care provided under this article;

Communicate the views of the medical care professions in these respects to the administering agency;

Communicate the views of the administering agency in these respects to the medical care professions; and

Encourage physicians and other medical care personnel to participate in medical care programs herein authorized and prescribed, although such participation shall not be mandatory upon any such personnel.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-05; Laws, 1964, ch. 446, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 43-13-11.
Program administration and vendor payments.

The administering agency is authorized to contract with other state government and nongovernment agencies and organizations in the State of Mississippi for purposes of performing all or part of the administrative aspects of medical or remedial care programs herein authorized, paying a reasonable fee for such service.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-06; Laws, 1964, ch. 446, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 43-13-13.
Penalties.

Any person, making application for benefits under this article for himself or for another person, and any vendor, who knowingly makes a false statement or false representation or fails to disclose a material fact to obtain or increase any benefit or payment under this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction therefor shall be punished by a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00), or imprisoned not to exceed thirty (30) days, or both such fine and imprisonment. Each subsequent false statement or false representation or failure to disclose a material fact shall constitute a separate offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-07; Laws, 1964, ch. 446, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1964).